North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-26.
General powers.

A corporation has the powers set forth in this section, subject to any limitations provided in any other statute of this state or in its articles.

A corporation has perpetual duration.

A corporation may sue and be sued, complain and defend and participate as a party or otherwise in any legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding, in its corporate name.

A corporation may purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal in and with, real or personal property, or any interest in property, wherever situated.

A corporation may sell, convey, mortgage, create a security interest in, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of its real or personal property, or any interest in property, wherever situated.

A corporation may purchase, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, exchange, mortgage, lend, create a security interest in, or otherwise dispose of, use and deal in and with, securities or other interests in, or obligations of, a person or direct or indirect obligations of any domestic or foreign government or instrumentality.

A corporation may make contracts and incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its securities, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage of or creation of a security interest in all or any of its property, franchises, and income.

A corporation may invest and reinvest its funds.

A corporation may take and hold real and personal property, whether or not of a kind sold or otherwise dealt in by the corporation, as security for the payment of money loaned, advanced, or invested.

A corporation may conduct its business, carry on its operations, have offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter anywhere in the universe.

Except as otherwise prohibited by law, a corporation may make donations, irrespective of corporate benefit, for the public welfare; for social, community, charitable, religious, educational, scientific, civic, literary, testing, and public safety purposes; for the purpose of fostering national or international amateur sports competition; the prevention of cruelty to children and animals; and for similar or related purposes.

A corporation may pay pensions, retirement allowances, and compensation for past services, and establish employee or incentive benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for the benefit of its and its related organizations’ officers, managers, directors, governors, employees, and agents and, in the case of a related organization that is a limited liability company, members who provide services to the limited liability company, and the families, dependents, and beneficiaries of any of them. It may indemnify and purchase and maintain insurance for a fiduciary of any of these employee benefit and incentive plans, trusts, and provisions.

A corporation may participate in any capacity in the promotion, organization, ownership, management, and operation of any organization or in any transaction, undertaking, or arrangement that the participating corporation would have power to conduct by itself, whether or not the participation involves sharing or delegation of control.

A corporation may provide for its benefit life insurance and other insurance with respect to the services of its officers, directors, employees, and agents, or on the life of a shareholder for the purpose of acquiring at the death of the shareholder any or all shares in the corporation owned by the shareholder.

A corporation may have, alter at pleasure, and use a corporate seal as provided in section 10-19.1-27.

A corporation may adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws relating to the management of the business or the regulation of the affairs of the corporation as provided in section 10-19.1-31.

A corporation may establish committees of the board of directors, elect or appoint persons to the committees, and define their duties as provided in section 10-19.1-48 and fix their compensation.

A corporation may elect or appoint officers, employees, and agents of the corporation, and define their duties and fix their compensation.

A corporation may issue securities and rights to purchase securities as provided in sections 10-19.1-61 through 10-19.1-69.

A corporation may lend money to, guarantee an obligation of, become a surety for, or otherwise financially assist persons as provided in section 10-19.1-89.

A corporation may make advances to its directors, officers, and employees and those of its subsidiaries as provided in section 10-19.1-90.

A corporation shall indemnify those persons identified in section 10-19.1-91 against certain expenses and liabilities only as provided in section 10-19.1-91 and may indemnify other persons.

A corporation may conduct all or part of its business under one or more trade names as provided in chapter 47-25.

A corporation may acquire an ownership interest in another organization.

A corporation may have and exercise all other powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the business purposes for which the corporation is incorporated.

A corporation only may seek to obtain a license or permit required of the state after the articles of incorporation are filed with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 14; 1995, ch. 54, § 1; 1995, ch. 103, § 11; 1997, ch. 103, § 9; 2019, ch. 92, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-04.

Cross-References.

Criminal responsibility of corporations, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-03-02.

Insurance company, general powers, see N.D.C.C. § 26.1-05-01.

Powers and management of banking association, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-03.

Collateral References.

Estoppel of stockholder to recover back or to secure restoration of compensation of corporate officers claimed to be exorbitant or unauthorized, 16 A.L.R.2d 467.

Widow or family of deceased officer, corporation’s power with respect to payment of remuneration, bonus, and the like to, 29 A.L.R.2d 1262.

Contracts: validity of contracts between corporations as affected by directors or officers in common, 33 A.L.R.2d 1060.

Indemnification for attorneys’ fees and other expenses incident to controversy respecting internal affairs of the corporation, corporation’s power to contract for, 39 A.L.R.2d 580.

Charities: corporation’s power to donate to a charitable or similar institution, 39 A.L.R.2d 1192, 1195.

Architecture, corporation’s practice of, 56 A.L.R.2d 726.

Partnership or joint venture, corporation’s power to enter into, 60 A.L.R.2d 917.

Professional service corporation statutes, practice by attorneys and physicians as corporate entities or associations under, 4 A.L.R.3d 383.

Trust involving a determination regarding the personal conduct or needs of beneficiaries, power of corporation to execute, 11 A.L.R.3d 300.

Indemnity for civil or criminal liability incurred by employee’s violation of antitrust laws, right of corporation to, 37 A.L.R.3d 1355.

Power of corporation to make political contribution or expenditure under state law, 79 A.L.R.3d 491.

Law Reviews.

The Corporation as Managing Partner in a Limited Partnership, 55 N.D. L. Rev. 237 (1979).

10-19.1-27.
Corporate seal.

A corporation may, but need not, have a corporate seal. The use or nonuse of a corporate seal does not affect the validity, recordability, or enforceability of a record or act. If a corporation has a corporate seal, the use of the seal by the corporation on a record is not necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 2005, ch. 100, § 8.

10-19.1-28.
Defense of ultra vires.

No act of a corporation and no conveyance or transfer of real or personal property to or by a corporation is invalid by reason of the fact that the corporation was without capacity or power to do such act or to make or receive such conveyance or transfer but such lack of capacity or power may be asserted:

In a proceeding by a shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the doing of any act or acts or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the corporation. If the unauthorized acts or transfers sought to be enjoined are being, or are to be, performed or made pursuant to any contract to which the corporation is a party, the court may, if all of the parties to the contract are parties to the proceeding and if it deems the same to be equitable, set aside and enjoin the performance of such contract, and in so doing may allow to the corporation or to the other parties to the contract, as the case may be, compensation for the loss or damage sustained by either of them which may result from the action of the court in setting aside and enjoining the performance of such contract. However, anticipated profits to be derived from the performance of the contract shall not be awarded by the court as a loss or damage sustained.

In a proceeding by the corporation, whether acting directly or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, or through shareholders in a representative suit, against the incumbent or former officers or directors of the corporation.

In a proceeding by the attorney general, as provided in this chapter, to dissolve the corporation or to enjoin the corporation from the transaction of unauthorized business.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-06.

Cross-References.

Actions by shareholders, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-86.

Attorney general’s proceeding to dissolve corporation, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-118.

Liability of directors in certain cases, see N.D.C.C. §§ 10-19.1-94, 10-19.1-95.

Quo warranto, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-13.

Collateral References.

Estoppel of stockholder to recover back or to secure restoration of compensation of corporate officers claimed to be exorbitant or unauthorized, 16 A.L.R.2d 467.

Rights of creditors of corporation with respect to its purchase or acquisition of its own stock, 47 A.L.R.2d 758.

Who may assert invalidity of sale, mortgage, or other disposition of corporate property without approval of stockholders, 58 A.L.R.2d 784.

10-19.1-29.
Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers — Liability.

All persons who assume to act as a corporation without authority are jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-23.

10-19.1-30.
Organization.

If the first board is not named in the articles, the incorporators may elect the first board or may act as directors with all of the powers, rights, duties, and liabilities of directors, until directors are elected or until shares are issued, whichever occurs first.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation, the incorporators or the directors named in the articles shall, within a reasonable time, hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators or of the directors named in the articles or take written action, for the purposes of transacting business and taking actions necessary or appropriate to complete the organization of the corporation, including amending the articles; electing directors; adopting bylaws; electing officers; adopting banking resolutions; authorizing or ratifying the purchase, lease, or other acquisition of suitable space, furniture, furnishings, supplies, and materials; approving a corporate seal; approving forms of certificates for shares of the corporation; adopting a fiscal year for the corporation; accepting subscriptions for and issuing shares of the corporation; and making any appropriate tax elections. If a meeting is held, the person or persons calling the meeting shall give at least three days’ notice of the meeting to each incorporator or director named, stating the date, time, and place of the meeting. Incorporators and directors may waive notice of an organizational meeting in the same manner a director may waive notice of meetings of the board under subsection 5 of section 10-19.1-43.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 12; 1997, ch. 103, § 10; 1999, ch. 95, § 11.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-57.

Cross-References.

Banking associations, bylaws, see N.D.C.C. § 6-03-02(6).

10-19.1-31.
Bylaws.

A corporation may, but need not, have bylaws. Bylaws may contain any provision relating to the management or the regulation of the affairs of the corporation not inconsistent with section 10-19.1-32 or any other provision of law or the articles, including:

The number of directors, and the qualifications, manner of election, powers, duties, and compensation, if any, of directors;

The qualifications of shareholders;

Different classes of shares;

The manner of admission, withdrawal, suspension, and expulsion of shareholders;

Property, voting, and other rights and privileges of shareholders;

The appointment and authority of committees;

The appointment or election, duties, compensation, and tenure of officers;

The time, place, and manner of calling, conducting, and giving notice of shareholder, board, and committee meetings, or of conducting mail ballots;

The making of reports and financial statements to shareholders; or

The number establishing a quorum for meetings of members and the board.

Unless reserved by the articles to shareholders with voting rights, initial bylaws may be adopted by a majority of the incorporators, or by the first board pursuant to section 10-19.1-30. Unless reserved by the articles to the shareholders with voting rights, the power to adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws is vested in the board. The power of the board is subject to the power of the shareholders, exercisable in the manner provided in subsection 3, to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws adopted, amended, or repealed by the board.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a shareholder or shareholders holding five percent or more of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote may propose a resolution for action by the shareholders to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws adopted, amended, or repealed by the board.

The resolution must set forth the provisions proposed for adoption, amendment, or repeal.

The limitations and procedures for submitting, considering, and adopting the resolution are the same as provided in subsections 2, 3, and 4 of section 10-19.1-19 for amendment of the articles.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 11; 2001, ch. 112, § 4; 2003, ch. 85, § 6; 2011, ch. 87, § 12.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-25.

10-19.1-32.
Board.

The business and affairs of a corporation must be managed by or under the direction of a board, subject to subsection 2 and section 10-19.1-83. The members of the first board may be named in the articles or elected by the incorporators pursuant to section 10-19.1-30 or by the shareholders.

The holders of the shares entitled to vote for directors of the corporation may, by unanimous affirmative vote, take any action that this chapter requires or permits the board to take. As to an action taken by the shareholders in that manner:

The directors have no duties, liabilities, or responsibilities as directors under this chapter with respect to or arising from the action.

The shareholders collectively and individually have all of the duties, liabilities, and responsibilities of directors under this chapter with respect to and arising from the action.

If the action relates to a matter required or permitted by this chapter or by any other law to be approved or adopted by the board, either with or without approval or adoption by the shareholders, the action is deemed to have been approved or adopted by the board.

A requirement that an instrument filed with a governmental agency contain a statement that the action has been approved and adopted by the board is satisfied by a statement that the shareholders have taken the action under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 15.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-36.

10-19.1-33.
Number of directors.

The board must consist of one or more directors. The number of directors must be fixed by or in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws. The number of directors may be increased or, subject to section 10-19.1-41, decreased at any time by amendment to or in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-37.

10-19.1-34.
Qualifications and election of directors.

Directors must be individuals. The method of election and any additional qualifications for directors may be imposed by or in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-36, 10-19-37.

Collateral References.

Election: corporation as necessary or proper party defendant in proceedings to determine validity of election or appointment of corporate director or officer, 21 A.L.R.2d 1048.

Change in number of directors, construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to, 3 A.L.R.3d 623.

Replacement: validity of agreement in conjunction with sale of corporate shares that majority of directors will be replaced by purchaser’s designees, 13 A.L.R.3d 361.

10-19.1-35.
Terms of directors.

With respect to length of terms:

Unless fixed terms are provided for in the articles or bylaws, a director serves for an indefinite term that expires at the next regular meeting of the shareholders.

A fixed term of a director, other than an ex officio director, may not exceed five years.

An ex officio director serves as long as the director holds the office or position designated in the articles or bylaws.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a director holds office until expiration of the term for which the director was elected or appointed and until a successor is elected and has qualified, or until the earlier death, resignation, removal, or disqualification of the director.

A decrease in the number of directors or term of office does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws, the term of a director filling a vacancy expires at the end of the unexpired term that the director is filling.

The articles or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups. The terms of office of the groups need not be uniform.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 12.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-37.

10-19.1-36.
Acts not void or voidable.

The expiration of a director’s term with or without the election of a qualified successor does not make prior or subsequent acts of the officers or the board void or voidable.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

10-19.1-37.
Compensation of directors.

Subject to any limitations in the articles or bylaws, the board may fix the compensation of directors.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-36.

10-19.1-38.
Classification of directors.

Directors may be divided into classes as provided in the articles or bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-38.

10-19.1-39.
Voting for directors — Cumulative voting.

With respect to the election of directors:

Unless otherwise provided in the articles and subject to subsection 2, directors are elected by a plurality of the voting power of the shares present and entitled to vote on the election of directors at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, and except as provided in subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-41, each shareholder entitled to vote for directors has the right to cumulate those votes in all elections of directors by giving written notice of intent to cumulate those votes to any officer of the corporation before the meeting, or to the presiding officer at the meeting at which the election is to occur at any time before the election of directors at the meeting, in which case:

The presiding officer at the meeting shall announce, before the election of directors, that shareholders may cumulate their votes; and

Each shareholder shall cumulate those votes either by casting for one candidate the number of votes equal to the number of directors to be elected multiplied by the number of votes represented by the shares entitled to vote, or by distributing all of those votes on the same principle among any number of candidates.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 2005, ch. 100, § 9; 2007, ch. 101, § 8.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-33.

10-19.1-40.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by giving written notice to the corporation. The resignation is effective without acceptance when the notice is given to the corporation, unless a later effective time is specified in the notice.

If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 13.

10-19.1-41.
Nonjudicial removal of directors.

The provisions of this section apply unless modified by the articles, the bylaws, or an agreement described in section 10-19.1-83.

A director may be removed at any time, with or without cause, if:

The director was named by the board to fill a vacancy;

The shareholders have not elected directors in the interval between the time of the appointment to fill a vacancy and the time of the removal; and

A majority of the remaining directors present affirmatively vote to remove the director.

Except as provided in subsection 4, any or all of the directors may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote at an election of directors. However, if a director has been elected solely by the holders of a class or series of shares, as stated in the articles or bylaws, then that director may be removed only by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all shares of that class or series entitled to vote at an election of that director.

In a corporation having cumulative voting, unless the entire board is removed simultaneously, a director is not removed from the board if there are cast against removal of the director the votes of a proportion of the voting power sufficient to elect the director at an election of the entire board under cumulative voting.

New directors may be elected at a meeting at which directors are removed. If the corporation allows cumulative voting and if a shareholder notifies the presiding officer at any time prior to the election of new directors of interest to cumulate the votes of the shareholders, then the presiding officer shall announce before the election that cumulative voting is in effect and shareholders shall cumulate their votes as provided in subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-39.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 14; 2007, ch. 101, § 9.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-40.

Cross-References.

Removal of officers, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-58.

Collateral References.

Replacement: validity of agreement in conjunction with sale of corporate shares that majority of directors will be replaced by purchaser’s designees, 13 A.L.R.3d 361.

10-19.1-41.1.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The district court of the county where the principal executive office of a corporation is located may remove any director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or its shareholders holding at least ten percent of the voting power of any class of shares, if the court finds:

The director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation;

A final judgment has been entered finding that the director has violated section 10-19.1-50; and

Removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from serving on the board for a period prescribed by the court.

If the shareholders commence a proceeding under subdivision a of subsection 1, then the corporation shall be made a party defendant.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 15.

10-19.1-42.
Board vacancies.

Unless different rules for filling vacancies are provided for in the articles or bylaws:

Vacancies on the board resulting from the death, resignation, removal, or disqualification of a director may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, even though the remaining directors constitute less than a quorum; and

Vacancies on the board resulting from newly created directorships may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors serving at the time of the increase.

Each director elected under this section to fill a vacancy holds office until a qualified successor is elected by the shareholders at the next regular or special meeting of the shareholders.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 16.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-39.

Collateral References.

Vacancies in directorships, provision authorizing directors to fill as applicable to newly created directorships, 6 A.L.R.2d 174.

10-19.1-43.
Board meetings.

Meetings of the board may be held from time to time as provided in the articles or bylaws at any place within or without the state that the board may select or by any means described in subsection 2.

If the articles, bylaws, or board fail to select a place for a meeting, the meeting must be held at the principal executive office, unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise.

The board may determine under subsection 2 that a meeting of the board shall be held solely by means of remote communication.

Any participation in a meeting by a means set forth in subsection 2 constitutes presence in person at the meeting.

Any meeting may be conducted:

Solely by one or more means of remote communication through which all of the directors may participate with each other during the meeting:

If the notice required by subsection 3 is given for the meeting; and

If the number of directors participating in the meeting is a quorum at a meeting.

By means of conference telephone or, if authorized by the board, by one or more other means of remote communication, in each case, through which the director, other directors so participating, and all directors physically present at the meeting may participate with each other during the meeting.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide for a different time period, a director may call a board meeting by giving at least ten days’ notice or, in the case of organizational meetings pursuant to subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-30, at least three days’ notice, to all directors of the date, time, and place of the meeting.

The notice need not state the purpose of the meeting unless the articles or bylaws require it.

Any notice to a director given under any provision of this chapter, the articles, or the bylaws by a form of electronic communication consented to by the director to whom the notice is given is effective when given.

Consent by a director to notice given by electronic communication may be given in writing or by authenticated electronic communication.

Any consent so given may be relied upon until revoked by the director.

However, no revocation affects the validity of any notice given before a receipt of revocation of the consent.

If the date, time, and place of a board meeting have been provided in the articles or bylaws, or announced at a previous meeting of the board, no notice is required. Notice of an adjourned meeting need not be given other than by announcement at the meeting at which adjournment is taken.

A director may waive notice of a meeting of the board. A waiver of notice by a director entitled to notice is effective whether given before, at, or after the meeting, and whether given in writing, by authenticated electronic communication, or by attendance. Attendance by a director at a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except when the director objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and does not participate in the meeting after the objection.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 13; 1997, ch. 103, § 17; 2003, ch. 85, § 7; 2005, ch. 100, § 10; 2009, ch. 106, § 9.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-29, 10-19-43.

10-19.1-44.
Absent directors.

If the articles or bylaws so provide, a director may give advance written consent or opposition to a proposal to be acted on at a board meeting. If the director is not present at the meeting, consent or opposition to a proposal does not constitute presence for purposes of determining the existence of a quorum, but consent or opposition must be counted as the vote of a director present at the meeting in favor of or against the proposal and must be entered in the minutes or other record of action at the meeting, if the proposal acted on at the meeting is substantially the same or has substantially the same effect as the proposal to which the director has consented or objected.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 14.

10-19.1-45.
Quorum of directors.

A majority, or a larger or smaller proportion or number provided in the articles or bylaws, of the directors currently holding office is a quorum for the transaction of business. In the absence of a quorum, a majority of the directors present may adjourn a meeting from time to time until a quorum is present. If a quorum is present when a duly called or held meeting is convened, the directors present may continue to transact business until adjournment, even though the withdrawal of a number of directors originally present leaves less than the proportion or number otherwise required for a quorum.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-41.

10-19.1-46.
Act of the board.

The board shall take action by the affirmative vote of the greater of a majority of the directors present at a duly held meeting at the time the action is taken, or a majority of the minimum proportion or number of directors that would constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at the meeting, except when this chapter or the articles require the affirmative vote of a larger proportion or number. If the articles require a larger proportion or number than is required by this chapter for a particular action, then the articles control.

The articles of a domestic corporation that is not incorporated under chapter 10-35 may confer upon one or more directors voting powers greater than or less than those of other directors.

After the adoption of the initial articles, an amendment to the articles to confer upon one or more directors voting powers greater than or less than those of other directors requires the approval of all of the shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment.

If the articles provide that any director has more or less than one vote on any matter, then:

Every reference in this chapter to a majority or other proportion of the directors shall refer to a majority or other proportion of the voting power of the directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, the bylaws, or the resolution establishing the committee or the subcommittee, any such provision conferring greater or lesser voting power applies to voting in a committee or subcommittee.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 15; 2009, ch. 106, § 10.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-41.

10-19.1-47.
Action without meeting by directors.

An action required or permitted to be taken at a board meeting may be taken by written action signed by all of the directors. If the articles so provide, any action, other than an action requiring shareholder approval, may be taken by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the number of directors that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the board at which all directors were present.

The written action is effective when signed by, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, the required number of directors, unless a different effective time is provided in the written action.

When written action is permitted to be taken by less than all directors, all directors must be notified immediately of its text and effective date. Failure to provide the notice does not invalidate the written action. A director who does not sign or consent to the written action has no liability for the action or actions.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 18; 2003, ch. 85, § 8; 2019, ch. 92, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

10-19.1-48.
Board committees.

A resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors currently holding office may establish committees having the authority of the board in the management of the business of the corporation only to the extent provided in the resolution. Committees may include a special litigation committee consisting of one or more independent directors or other independent persons to consider legal rights or remedies of the corporation and whether those rights or remedies should be pursued. Committees other than special litigation committees are subject at all times to the direction and control of the board.

Committee members must be individuals. Unless the articles or bylaws provide for a different membership or manner of appointment, a committee must consist of one or more persons, who need not be directors, appointed by the board.

Sections 10-19.1-43, 10-19.1-44, and 10-19.1-45 apply to committees and members of committees to the same extent as those sections apply to the board and directors.

Minutes, if any, of committee meetings must be made available upon request to members of the committee and to any director.

The establishment of, delegation of authority to, and action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standard of conduct set forth in section 10-19.1-50.

Committee members are deemed to be directors for purposes of sections 10-19.1-50, 10-19.1-51, and 10-19.1-91.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, the bylaws, or the resolution of the board establishing the committee, a committee may create one or more subcommittees, each consisting of one or more members of the committee, and may delegate to a subcommittee any or all of the authority of the committee. In this chapter, unless the language or the context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended:

Any reference to a committee is deemed to include a subcommittee; and

Any reference to a committee member is deemed to include a subcommittee member.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 16; 1997, ch. 103, § 19; 2007, ch. 101, § 10; 2009, ch. 106, § 11.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-42.

10-19.1-49.
Committee of disinterested persons. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 107.

10-19.1-50.
Standard of conduct for directors.

A director shall discharge the duties of the position of director in good faith, in a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation, and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances. A person who so performs those duties is not liable by reason of being or having been a director of the corporation.

A director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, in each case prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters that the director reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board upon which the director does not serve, duly established in accordance with section 10-19.1-48 as to matters within its designated authority, if the director reasonably believes the committee to merit confidence.

Subsection 2 does not apply to a director who has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes the reliance otherwise permitted by subsection 2 unwarranted.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board when an action is approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present is presumed to have assented to the action approved, unless the director:

Objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and does not participate thereafter in the meeting, in which case the director shall not be considered to be present at the meeting for any purpose of this chapter;

Votes against the action at the meeting; or

Is prohibited from voting on the action:

By the articles;

By the bylaws;

As the result of a decision to approve, ratify, or authorize a transaction pursuant to section 10-19.1-51; or

By a conflict of interest policy adopted by the board.

A director’s personal liability to the corporation or its shareholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director may be eliminated or limited in the articles. The articles may not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any breach of the director’s duty of loyalty to the corporation or its shareholders;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

Under section 10-19.1-95 or 10-04-17;

For any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit; or

For any act or omission occurring prior to the date when the provision in the articles eliminating or limiting liability becomes effective.

In discharging the duties of the position of director, a director may, in considering the best interests of the corporation, consider the interests of the corporation’s employees, customers, suppliers, and creditors, the economy of the state and nation, community and societal considerations, and the long-term as well as the short-term interests of the corporation and its shareholders, including the possibility that these interests may be best served by the continued independence of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 17; 1995, ch. 54, § 2; 1997, ch. 103, § 20.

Collateral References.

Duty of corporate directors to exercise “informed” judgment in recommending responses to merger or tender offers, 46 A.L.R.4th 887.

Rescission of Directors’ and Officers’ Liability Insurance Policy, 29 A.L.R.6th 189.

Construction and Application of Exclusion Provisions of Directors and Officers Insurance Policy, Exclusive of Regulatory and Insured vs. Insured Exclusions, 34 A.L.R.6th 345.

Law Reviews.

Corporate Governance and Shareholder Rights in a Time of Financial Crisis: How the North Dakota Publicly Traded Corporations Act Changes the Landscape: Article: Director Liability: A Cliche in North Dakota, see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 1109 (2008).